Washington statutes.
RCW 38.24.020

Audit and payment of awards.

All compensation shall be payable in monthly installments and shall be audited and paid as any other claim against the military department and shall be payable from the general fund out of any moneys not otherwise appropriated.

[ 1943 c 130 s 41; Rem. Supp. 1943 s 8603-41. Prior: 1917 c 107 s 35; 1909 c 134 s 56, part; 1895 c 108 s 41, part.]